Tennessee, session 114, SB0831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-116, is amended by adding the
following as new language on the permanent registration record when a person registers to
vote:
Political Party Affiliation _______________
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-118, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) At the time of initial registration or during the registration period under § 2-2-
109, each qualified voter may designate on the registration application an affiliation with
a political party qualified to participate in primary elections or may designate to be
designated as "Unaffiliated." The county election commission shall record the party
affiliation or unaffiliated designation as part of the voter's permanent registration record.
If a voter fails or refuses to make a designation, the county election commission shall
enter on the permanent registration records that the voter is unaffiliated.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-104(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Unaffiliated voter" means a voter who is not affiliated with a statewide
political party or recognized minor political party and who has no political party
preference.
SB0831
002916
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-7-115(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(2) It is the first primary election the voter has voted in after the effective date of
this act, and at the time the voter seeks to vote, the voter declares allegiance to the
political party in whose primary the voter seeks to vote and states that the voter intends
to affiliate with that party. The county election commission shall record the voter's
declaration or affirmation made at the time the voter seeks to vote as part of the voter's
permanent registration record. Once recorded, such declaration may be changed by the
voter in accordance with § 2-2-109.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002916